Washington statutes.
RCW 41.68.010

Legislative finding.

The dismissal or termination of various state employees during World War II resulted from the promulgation of federal Executive Order 9066 which was based mainly on fear and suspicion rather than on factual justification. It is fair and just that reparations be made to those employees who were terminated from state employment during the wartime years because of these circumstances. The legislature therefore finds that equity and fairness will be served by authorizing the filing of claims with the state for salary losses suffered by the state employees directly affected, and by authorizing the payment thereof, subject to the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 15 s 1.]